zh-CN: 轴长度类型: 加长; 特短; 中间长度; 长; 中等; 中等加长; 短; 中短; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta dolžine gredi: Zelo dolgo; Zelo kratko; Vmesno; Dolgo; Srednje; Srednje plus; Kratko; Tweenie; Drugo
vi: Loại chiều dài trục: Cực dài; Cực ngắn; Trung gian; Dài; Trung bình; Trung bình cộng; Ngắn; Lỡ; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de lungime a tijei: Extra lung; Extra scurt; Intermediar; Lung; Mediu; Mediu plus; Scurt; Tweenie; Altele
ru: Тип длины вала: Очень длинная; Очень короткая; Промежуточная; Длинная; Средняя; Выше средней; Короткая; Tweenie; Другое
sk-SK: Typ dĺžky hriadeľa: Extra dlhý; Extra krátky; Medziveľkosť; Dlhý; Stredný; Stredný plus; Krátky; Tweenie; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de comprimento da haste: Extralonga; Extracurta; Média; Longa; Média; Média plus; Curta; Intermédia; Outro
sv: Typ av axellängd: Extra lång; Extra kort; Mittemellan; Lång; Medium; Medium plus; Kort; Tweenie; Övrigt
cs: Typ délky násady: Extra dlouhý; Extra krátký; Mezivelikost; Dlouhý; Střední; Střední plus; Krátký; Tweenie; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta duljine osovine: Iznimno dugačko; Iznimno kratko; Prijelazna (in-between); Dugačko; Srednje; Srednje plus; Kratko; Tweenie; Ostalo
es: Tipo de largo de eje: Extralargo; Extracorto; Intermedio; Largo; Medio; Medio plus; Corto; Tweenie; Otro
fi: Varren pituustyyppi: Erittäin pitkä; Erittäin lyhyt; Välikoko; Pitkä; Keskipitkä; Keskipitkä plus; Lyhyt; Tweenie; Muu
ja: シャフト長さタイプ: エクストラロング; エクストラショート; インビトウィーン; ロング; ミディアム; ミディアムプラス; ショート; トゥイーニー; その他
hu: Szárhossz típusa: Extra hosszú; Extra rövid; Köztes; Hosszú; Közepes; Közepes plusz; Rövid; Tweenie; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип дължина на вала: Изключително дълъг; Изключително къс; Междинен; Дълъг; Среден; Среден плюс; Къс; Междинен (Tweenie); Друго
nl: Type schachtlengte: Extra lang; Extra kort; In-between; Lang; Medium; Medium plus; Kort; Tweenie; Overig
lt-LT: Kotelio ilgio tipas: Ypač ilgas; Ypač trumpas; Tarpinis; Ilgas; Vidutinis; Vidutinis plius; Trumpas; Tarpinis („Tweenie“); Kita
en: Shaft length type: Extra long; Extra short; In-between; Long; Medium; Medium plus; Short; Tweenie; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de comprimento da haste: Extralongo; Extracurto; Intermediário; Longo; Médio; Médio plus; Curto; Tweenie; Outro
de: Schaftlänge: Extralang; Extrakurz; Dazwischen; Lang; Mittel; Mittel plus; Kurz; Tweenie; Sonstige
pl: Typ długości trzonka: Bardzo długi; Bardzo krótki; Pośredni; Długi; Średni; Średni plus; Krótki; Tweenie; Inne
el: Τύπος μήκους άξονα: Πολύ μακρύ; Πολύ κοντό; Ενδιάμεσο; Μακρύ; Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο plus; Κοντό; Tweenie; Άλλο
nb: Type skaftlengde: Ekstra lang; Ekstra kort; Midt imellom; Lang; Medium; Medium pluss; Kort; Tweenie; Annet
zh-TW: 桿身長度類型: 特長; 特短; 中間; 長; 中等; 中長; 短; 中短; 其他
th: ประเภทความยาวเพลา: ยาวพิเศษ; สั้นพิเศษ; กึ่งกลาง; ยาว; ปานกลาง; Medium plus; สั้น; ทวีนนี; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di lunghezza del fusto: Extra lungo; Extra corto; Intermedio; Lungo; Medio; Medio più; Corto; Tweenie; Altro
da: Type af skaftlængde: Ekstra lang; Ekstra kort; Mellemlængde; Lang; Medium; Medium plus; Kort; Tweenie; Andet
fr: Type de longueur d'arbre: Très long; Très court; Intermédiaire; Long; Moyen; Moyen plus; Court; Tweenie; Autre
ko: 샤프트 길이 유형: 엑스트라 롱; 엑스트라 쇼트; 중간형; 롱; 미디엄; 미디엄 플러스; 쇼트; 트위니; 기타
tr: Mil uzunluk tipi: Ekstra uzun; Ekstra kısa; Ara boy; Uzun; Orta; Orta artı; Kısa; Tweenie; Diğer